Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-570
Abandoned real estate; sale; notice.

No sale under section 17-569 shall be had until at least thirty days' notice shall have been given by publication in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city or village.

Laws 1911, c. 17, § 3, p. 134;

R.S.1913, § 5179;

C.S.1922, § 4366;

C.S.1929, § 17-564;

R.S.1943, § 17-570;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 196.
August 24, 2017